Massachusetts, session 194th, H1563.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5A of Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following:-
The housing appeals committee will develop an application for property owners who
purchased homes through the Homeowner Opportunity Program thirty years or more before the
date of issuance of said application to remove any deed rider attached to said property. The
purpose of the application and committee decision will be to allow such homeowners to sell their
homes at fair market value after negotiation with the housing appeals committee. The housing
appeals committee must open the application process by June 1, 2026.
of 1